California, session 20252026, AB949.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 8 (commencing with Section 12100.70) is added to Chapter 1.6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to read: Article 8. Small Business Retail Theft Solutions Grant Program12100.70. (a) The Small Business Retail Theft Solutions Grant Program is hereby created within the Office of the Small Business Advocate.(b) The purpose of the program is to assist small businesses prevent and recover from retail theft.(c) In implementing the program, the office shall consult with local, regional, federal, and other state public and private entities that share a similar mission to support the needs of small businesses in California.(d) Upon appropriation of funds by the Legislature for the purpose of implementing this article, the office shall make grants to small businesses to expand the capacity of small business to prevent and recover from retail theft.